Louisiana, session 2026, SB227.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 24-F of Title 40 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 40:2530.11, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 24-F. PRE-SPECTRUM ALERT ACTION PLAN
§2530.11. Pre-Spectrum Alert action plan; requirements; rules and regulations
A. The legislature finds that autism spectrum disorder (ASD)
significantly affects children in this country, creating unique challenges that can
lead to critical safety risks, such as elopement or wandering behaviors in
children. Children with ASD are prone to wander from safe environments at a
higher rate than their nonautistic peers. Elopement frequently results in severe
consequences, including fatalities caused by traffic accidents and drowning.
Notably, drowning is the leading cause of death of children with ASD in this
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-6 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 227
country. The high propensity for elopement and the ineffectiveness of
traditional search and response methods necessitate a robust system that will
swiftly locate and ensure the safety of missing children with ASD. The
legislature finds that a standardized system is necessary to aid in the search for
a missing child with ASD.
B. No later than July 1, 2027, the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, in cooperation with the Department of Children and Family
Services, shall institute a pre-Spectrum Alert action plan to enhance the safety
and well-being of children with ASD through immediate and effective
community and emergency response. The plan shall, at a minimum, consist of
one or more programs to:
(1) Develop a training program and alert system for missing children
with ASD that is compatible with existing alert systems. The training program
shall implement crisis intervention team training to equip law enforcement
officers with the skills to understand ASD and other mental illnesses, to
de-escalate interactions with children in crisis, to facilitate appropriate
interventions, and to respond effectively to a reported missing child emergency
when the child has ASD.
(2) Establish policies and procedures for responding to a reported
missing child emergency when the child has ASD. The policies and procedures
shall, at a minimum, provide for all of the following:
(a) Immediate and widespread dissemination of critical information
when a child with ASD is reported missing.
(b) Enhancement of emergency response teams' competence by
informing them of the unique behaviors and needs of children with ASD.
(c) Measures to increase public awareness and understanding of the risks
associated with autism-related elopement, to foster community support for
children with ASD.
(3) Require a law enforcement agency, at a minimum, to do all of the
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-6 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 227
following upon receiving a missing child with ASD report:
(a) Contact media outlets in the affected area or inform all on-duty law
enforcement officers of the reported missing child with ASD.
(b) Communicate the report to all other law enforcement agencies in the
parishes surrounding the parish in which the report was filed.
C. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections and
the secretary of the Department of Children and Family Services may
promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to carry out the provisions of this Section.
D. The implementation of the provisions of this Section shall be subject
to the appropriation of funds by the legislature for this purpose.